Utah statutes.
63A-13-203.   Memorandum of understanding with fraud unit.

The inspector general shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the fraud unit to:

(1)  formalize communication, cooperation, coordination of efforts, and the sharing of information, on a regular basis, between the office and the fraud unit;

(2)  provide for reporting criminal activity discovered by the office to the fraud unit;

(3)  ensure that investigations and other actions by the office and the fraud unit do not conflict; and

(4)  provide for the sharing and classification of records between the office and the fraud unit under the Government Records Access and Management Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 12, 2013 General Session

